Maryland, session 2025, SB0756.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–108.
(A) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, AND EACH DECEMBER 31 EVERY 3
YEARS THEREAFTER, EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY, GAS COMPANY, GAS AND ELECTRIC
COMPANY, AND WATER COMPANY SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION AN AUDIT OF
UTILITY OPERATIONS, CUSTOMER USAGE, AND CUSTOMER BILLING.
(B) THE AUDIT SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION FOR THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 3 YEARS:
(1) CUSTOMER RATE INCREASES OR DECREASES;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0756*

SENATE BILL 756
(2) AN ANALYSIS OF THE FACTORS THAT LED TO ANY RATE INCREASES
OR DECREASES;
(3) CUSTOMER USAGE PATTERNS;
(4) CUSTOMER BILLING INCREASES OR DECREASES;
(5) A DESCRIPTION OF AND ANY CHANGES TO THE COMPANY’S
BILLING PRACTICES AND POLICIES, INCLUDING ANY FORMS USED; AND
(6) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE COMMISSION REQUIRES.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) DETERMINE THE FORMAT OF THE AUDIT REPORTING REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) PUBLISH EACH AUDIT SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION ON ITS
WEBSITE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.